Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-117
Domestic abuse protection order granted to respondent; when.

When ruling on a petition for a domestic abuse protection order, a court shall only grant a respondent a domestic abuse protection order if (1) the respondent files a cross or counter petition seeking a protection order and (2) the issuing court makes specific findings of domestic or family abuse against the respondent and determines that the respondent is entitled to a protection order.

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 42-924.03;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 17.